Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1834
Public advocate; records; how kept.

The files, records, and documents of the public advocate shall be separately kept, maintained, and controlled by the public advocate.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 34.